Utah statutes.
19-6-202.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Board" means the Solid and Hazardous Waste Control Board created in
Section 19-1-106.
(2)  "Disposal" means the final disposition of hazardous wastes into or onto
the lands, waters, and air of this state.
(3)  "Hazardous wastes" means wastes as defined in Section 19-6-102.
(4)  "Hazardous waste treatment, disposal, and storage facility" means a
facility or site used or intended to be used for the treatment, storage, or
disposal of hazardous waste materials, including but not limited to physical,
chemical, or thermal processing systems, incinerators, and secure landfills.
(5)  "Site" means land used for the treatment, disposal, or storage of
hazardous wastes.
(6)  "Siting plan" means the state hazardous waste facilities siting plan
adopted by the board pursuant to Sections 19-6-204 and  19-6-205.
(7)  "Storage" means the containment of hazardous wastes for a period of more
than 90 days.
(8)  "Treatment" means any method, technique, or process designed to change
the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of any
hazardous waste to neutralize or render it nonhazardous, safer for transport,
amenable to recovery or storage, convertible to another usable material, or
reduced in volume and suitable for ultimate disposal.
